North Carolina, session 2025, SB531.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 4 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 122C-146A. Reimbursement for extended inpatient treatment.
An LME or LME/MCO, as appropriate, shall reimburse the costs incurred by private entities
for inpatient treatment services extending beyond 30 days performed on behalf of clients under
a commitment order."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to treatment by
private entities beginning on or after that date.
*S531-v-1*